Idaho, session 2026, S1307.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 9, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 12, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1210, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1210. INJURING DITCH OR HEADGATE -- TRIPLE DAMAGES. (1) No person
shall, without the consent of a water delivery organization, as that term is
defined in section 42-1301, Idaho Code, a lateral manager of a lateral water
users' association established pursuant to chapter 13, title 42, Idaho Code,
or a watermaster of a water district established pursuant to chapter 6, title
42, Idaho Code, wrongfully:
(a) Divert any water from the ditch or channel where it was placed,
caused to be, or left to run by the water delivery organization, a lat-
eral manager, a watermaster, or an authorized representative thereof;
(b) Shut or open any ditch, gate, pump, diversion structure, or dam with
intent to:
(i) Divert any water without a right to do so; or
(ii) Deprive any person of the use of the water during any part of
the time that such person is entitled to the use of such water;
(c) Cut or alter any ditch; or
(d) Break or destroy any gate, pump, diversion structure, or dam.
(2) A person who violates the provisions of this section shall be liable
in a civil action to the person injured at three (3) times the actual damage
sustained in consequence of any such wrongful act or acts.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 12, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1211, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


42-1211. LIABILITY FOR WASTE OF WATER. Any person entitled to the use
of water from any ditch, canal, or conduit who willfully or wantonly wastes
water in a manner that causes injury or damage to another person's real prop-
erty shall be liable in a civil action to the owner of the injured or damaged
real property.
SECTION 4. That Section 42-1301, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 42-1302, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 42-1303, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 42-1304, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 42-1305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 42-1306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Section 42-1307, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 42-1308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. That Section 42-1309, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 42-1313, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1301, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1301. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Delivery point" means the location where a water delivery organi-
zation transfers the control of water to the water users on a lateral.
(2) "Lateral" means any ditch, canal, or conduit not operated and main-
tained by a water delivery organization that is shared by water users enti-
tled to receive water from:
(a) The same delivery point or points; or
(b) The same point or points of diversion from a natural water source.
(3) "Water delivery organization" means any entity recognized by Idaho
law that operates water diversion and delivery facilities, including but not
limited to a canal company, ditch company, irrigation company, irrigation
district, reservoir company, reservoir district, or water company. A water


delivery organization does not include a lateral water users' association
created pursuant to this chapter.
(4) "Water user" means any person or entity entitled to receive water
through a lateral.
SECTION 15. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1302, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1302. LATERAL WATER USERS' ASSOCIATION ORGANIZATION -- BOARD OF
DIRECTORS AND LATERAL MANAGER. (1) Water users who share a common lateral or
laterals shall be members of and shall constitute a water users' association
known as a lateral water users' association.
(2) The association shall meet annually between January 1 and the last
Monday in March of each year.
(a) The secretary-treasurer of the association shall call the annual
meeting by providing ten (10) days' written notice before the annual
meeting date.
(b) If for any reason the secretary-treasurer fails to call a meeting,
the annual meeting shall be held on the last Monday in March.
(3) At the annual meeting, the association shall:
(a) Elect a chair, vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer to serve as the
association's board of directors for one (1) year or until successors
are elected;
(b) Elect a lateral manager to manage the distribution of water; and
(c) Set the compensation of such elected officers.
(4) The association may:
(a) Adopt rules and regulations for the management of the lateral or
laterals and the delivery of water therefrom;
(b) By majority vote, if it is considered to be in the best interests of
the lateral water users' association, combine one (1) or more laterals
or abandon any lateral not in use; and
(c) Take any lawful action if doing so is in the best interests of the
association.
(5) Each water user in the association shall be entitled to cast one (1)
vote, in person, for each inch of water the water user is entitled to receive
from the lateral and a fractional vote equal to the fraction of an inch of
water the water user is entitled to receive. Corporations or other legally
recognized entities may designate a representative to cast the vote accord-
ing to this subsection.
SECTION 16. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1303, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1303. LATERAL MANAGER -- DUTIES -- ALTERNATE METHODS OF ELECTION
OR APPOINTMENT. (1) The lateral manager shall ascertain and ensure that the
amount of water that each water user is entitled to receive is properly ap-
portioned and distributed for the succeeding irrigation season.
(2) Should a lateral water users' association fail to elect a lateral
manager or fix such manager's compensation at its annual meeting:


(a) The association's board of directors may elect a lateral manager
and set such manager's compensation; or
(b) The association's water users may select and appoint a lateral man-
ager by a written document that designates the manager, sets the compen-
sation, and is signed by a majority of water users from the association.
(3) Any lateral manager elected or appointed pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section or section 42-1302, Idaho Code, shall:
(a) Have documentation of their election or appointment recorded with:
(i) The manager, superintendent, or board of directors of the wa-
ter delivery organization that delivers water to the lateral's de-
livery point or points; or
(ii) The watermaster of the state water district appointed pur-
suant to section 42-605, Idaho Code, who delivers water to the
point or points of diversion from a natural water source; and
(b) Be treated as the lateral manager by the water delivery organiza-
tion for the succeeding irrigation season unless such organization is
notified by the lateral water users' association that a new lateral man-
ager has been elected or appointed.
(4) Any water delivery organization delivering water to a lateral de-
livery point or points may, upon providing reasonable notice, refuse deliv-
ery of water for failure of the water users to appoint or select a lateral
manager pursuant to this section or section 42-1302, Idaho Code.
SECTION 17. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1304, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1304. LATERAL MANAGER -- APPOINTMENT BY WATER DELIVERY ORGANIZA-
TION. (1) If an association's water users do not elect or otherwise appoint
a lateral manager pursuant to section 42-1302 or 42-1303, Idaho Code, the
board of directors of the water delivery organization that delivers water to
the lateral may, upon the written request of one (1) or more of the associ-
ation's water users, appoint and set the compensation of a lateral manager.
Such compensation shall be assessed to the water users pursuant to this chap-
ter and may be collected in the same manner as other assessments are col-
lected by the water delivery organization.
(2) A lateral manager appointed pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Have and exercise all of the powers and perform all of the duties of
a lateral manager as described in this chapter; and
(b) Serve only for the period fixed by the appointment and not beyond
the remainder of the year in which the manager is appointed.
SECTION 18. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1305, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1305. LATERAL MANAGER -- APPOINTMENT BY DIRECTOR OF DEPARTMENT
OF WATER RESOURCES. (1) If water users taking water from the same point or
points of diversion from any natural water source do not select or elect a
lateral manager as provided in this chapter, then the director of the depart-
ment of water resources may appoint and set the compensation of a lateral


manager upon the written request from one (1) or more of the association's
water users alleging that water is not being apportioned and distributed
properly among the water users from the lateral and that the rights of the
water users are thereby being injured.
(2) A lateral manager appointed by the director pursuant to this sec-
tion:
(a) May set and collect assessments as is necessary to achieve the
proper allocation and distribution of water from laterals;
(b) Shall not borrow money or otherwise mortgage or pledge assets pur-
suant to this chapter; and
(c) Shall serve only for the period fixed by the appointment and not be-
yond the remainder of the year in which the manager is appointed.
(3) If the lateral is within a water district established pursuant to
chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code, the director shall, upon receipt of request
for appointment of a lateral manager, advise the watermaster of the request
and invite the watermaster to make recommendations concerning the need for
appointment of a lateral manager and the nomination of a person to be ap-
pointed if an appointment is necessary.
(4) The director shall make a reasonable effort to provide written no-
tice of the request to all affected lateral water users. Except in the case
of serious threat of imminent injury to person or property, the director
shall allow fourteen (14) days for written response to the request.
(5) Based on a review of the request, the responses thereto, the rec-
ommendations of the watermaster, and any investigation by the department
of water resources, the director shall issue a decision either appointing a
lateral manager or declining appointment of a lateral manager. Any person
aggrieved by the director's decision shall be entitled to request a hearing
before the director pursuant to section 42-1701A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 19. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1306, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1306. LATERALS -- REPAIRS, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MAINTENANCE --
ASSESSMENT OF COSTS. (1) Water users shall keep their laterals in good condi-
tion for carrying and distributing water.
(2) A water delivery organization may send written notices to water
users or a lateral water users' association specifying any lateral mainte-
nance deficiencies and a reasonable time to remedy the deficiencies. The
water delivery organization may refuse delivery of water for failure of the
water users or lateral water users' association to adequately maintain any
lateral pursuant to the water delivery organization's notice.
(3) Water users or a lateral water users' association who neglect or
refuse to perform the duties imposed on them by this section shall have no
cause of action, including damages, against the water delivery organization
for failure to deliver or distribute water to the lateral.
(4) The operation, improvement, repair, and maintenance of any lateral
shall be under the direction of the association's board of directors. The
board, with the lateral manager, shall examine laterals with maintenance de-
ficiencies and prepare an estimate of the total cost to repair, operate, and
maintain the lateral so that water can be properly delivered to the asso-


ciation's water users during the succeeding irrigation season. Such total
costs, plus compensation for the board members and lateral manager, shall be
assessed to each water user either:
(a) In the proportion which the quantity of water the water user is en-
titled to receive from the lateral or laterals bears to the total quan-
tity of water which all lateral water users' association water users are
entitled to receive; or
(b) If the water user's land consists of a lot or lots within a city or
village, then the assessment may be made on the basis of each lot, the
same to be uniform on lots of the same size.
SECTION 20. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1307, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1307. ASSESSMENTS -- NOTICE -- PENALTIES FOR DELINQUENCY. (1) On or
before April 15, an association's secretary-treasurer of the lateral water
users' association shall assess each water user for that year. Such assess-
ment shall be due and payable on May 1 each year. If the assessment is not
paid by the water user on or before June 15 each year:
(a) A penalty of ten percent (10%) may be added thereto; and
(b) The total amount due shall then draw interest at the rate of ten per-
cent (10%) per annum from June 15 until paid.
(2) The lateral water users' association may, by vote of the water users
at any annual meeting, set dates for notice and payment of assessments and
any related late fees that are different than those prescribed by this sec-
tion, provided that each water user is always given at least fifteen (15)
days' notice to make a payment.
SECTION 21. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1308, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1308. DELINQUENT WATER USERS NOT ENTITLED TO WATER. (1) No water
user that has a delinquent assessment shall be entitled to demand or receive
water from a lateral.
(2) The lateral manager shall not distribute any water to the water
user that has a delinquent assessment except upon order of the association's
board of directors, who may allow the delivery of water if the water user
provides security satisfactory to the board for the payment of any such
delinquent assessment.
SECTION 22. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1309, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1309. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF FUNDS. (1) A lateral water
users' association's lateral manager or secretary-treasurer shall collect
all assessments made to the association and shall deposit the same into an
account that is in the name of the association.
(2) The secretary-treasurer shall:


(a) Keep the funds of the association in the account and pay the costs
and expenses for the management and operation of the laterals; and
(b) Upon the order of the association's board of directors, perform
other duties as the association may prescribe.
SECTION 23. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1310, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1310. ACTION FOR COLLECTION OF DELINQUENT ASSESSMENTS -- ATTOR-
NEY'S FEES. (1) A lateral water users' association's board of directors or
lateral manager, or the water delivery organization associated therewith,
may sue to collect any delinquent assessments that are due and unpaid in any
court of competent jurisdiction.
(2) Reasonable attorney's costs and fees may be collected, as deter-
mined by the court, in addition to the full delinquent assessment and all
penalties and interest associated therewith and costs incurred in attempt-
ing to collect such assessment.
SECTION 24. That Section 42-1311, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1311. AMOUNT AND LIEN OF ASSESSMENTS BY LATERAL WATER USERS' ASSO-
CIATION. (1) The amount assessed against each water user, together with any
penalties and interest, shall be a first and prior lien, except as to a lien
related to taxes and assessments of a water delivery organization, upon the
water user's land that is entitled to receive water from the point or points
of delivery in the canal or reservoir, or from the point or points of diver-
sion from waters of the state, that supplies the association's lateral or
ditch.
(2) The lien shall be recorded and collected in accordance with
pursuant to section 55-3207, Idaho Code, governing homeowner's association
liens, except that the lien may be continued in force for a period of time
not to exceed three (3) years and may be extended not to exceed three (3)
additional years. The lien provided for in this section shall have priority
according to its date of recordation, except as to other liens described in
titles 42 and 43, Idaho Code.
SECTION 25. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1312, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1312. LATERAL WATER USERS' ASSOCIATION AUTHORIZED TO BORROW MONEY
OR TO MORTGAGE OR PLEDGE ASSETS. (1) A lateral water users' association may:
(a) Borrow money to repay a loan;
(b) Mortgage or pledge any assets of the association as security for a
loan; and
(c) Levy assessments to repay a loan.
(2) Before any money can be borrowed or any mortgage or pledge can be
made or entered into, the association's secretary-treasurer shall send a
written notice to all water users to inform the water users that an election


is being called to determine whether or not the association, through its
chair and secretary-treasurer, may borrow money or mortgage or pledge its
assets. Such notice shall include a brief description of the proposed action
and the date, time, and place of such election, which shall be held at least
ten (10) days after the date of the secretary-treasurer's notice.
(3) The election shall be determined by a majority vote of the water
users present at the election in accordance with section 42-1302(5), Idaho
Code.
SECTION 26. That Section 42-1312, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1312. 42-1313. WITHDRAWAL FROM LATERAL WATER USERS' ASSOCIA-
TION. (1) A water user may withdraw from the a water users' association by
providing written notice and proof that the water user's land is no longer
entitled to receive water from the water delivery organization and the point
or points of delivery in the canal or reservoir, or from the point or points
of diversion from waters of the state, that supplies the association's lat-
eral or ditch.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect any delinquent assessment or lien
recorded against the water user's land pursuant to section 42-1311, Idaho
Code, prior to this chapter that accrued before the user's withdrawal.
SECTION 27. That Section 42-1310, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1310. 42-1314. LATERAL DITCHES WATER DELIVERY ORGANIZATIONS --
REPAIRS, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MAINTENANCE BY IRRIGATION DELIVERY ENTITIES OF
LATERALS. (1) In the event that a water users' association of lateral or lat-
erals has not been constituted on a particular lateral or distributing ditch
If a lateral water users' association has not elected a board of directors or
appointed a lateral manager pursuant to this chapter, any individual water
user taking water from a canal or reservoir to be conveyed to their respec-
tive premises for any distance through such lateral or distributing ditch
may authorize the irrigation delivery entity lateral may authorize the water
delivery organization providing water to the lateral or ditch to perform any
necessary repairs, improvements, or maintenance to the lateral or ditch.
(2) The irrigation delivery entity may agree to perform such work only
if it has duly adopted a bylaw authorizing such work to be done for its in-
dividual water users, or adopts water delivery organization may perform the
requested work only if the organization's board has adopted a resolution au-
thorizing the work.
(3) In performing such work, the irrigation delivery entity The water
delivery organization shall have the same rights and privileges as the wa-
ter user authorizing the work to enter the land across which the associated
right-of-way extends, for the purposes of cleaning, maintaining and repair-
ing the lateral or ditch, and to perform such work, as does the individual
water user authorizing the work to clean, maintain, repair, and perform such
other work as may be done by the authorizing water user.
(4) By performing such work, the irrigation delivery entity water
delivery organization does not assume ownership of the lateral or ditch,


or responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to person or prop-
erty caused by an act or omission of the individual authorizing water user
authorizing the work, or of any other person.
(5) When such work has been authorized, the irrigation entity shall as-
sess the individual water delivery organization may assess the respective
authorizing water user or users for the annual cost of any necessary repairs,
improvements, or maintenance performed on the lateral or ditch, in addition
to the assessments that are levied by the water delivery organization for the
delivery of water to the individual water user or users, and the same provi-
sions shall apply with regard to delinquent assessments as in the case of as-
sessments levied by the water delivery organization for the delivery of wa-
ter.
(6) Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of a lateral wa-
ter users' association of lateral or laterals from assessing its members for
work authorized under pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 28. That Chapter 13, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1315, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1315. WATER DELIVERY ORGANIZATIONS TO FURNISH DIVERSION STRUC-
TURES AND MEASURING DEVICES. (1) Each water delivery organization shall
provide the necessary diversion structures and measuring devices at deliv-
ery points to control and measure the quantity of water being delivered to
water users served by the water delivery organization, unless the bylaws or
controlling documents of the water delivery organization provide otherwise.
(2) Measuring devices shall comply with standards approved by the de-
partment of water resources.
SECTION 29. That Section 18-4310, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4310. NEGLECT TO DELIVER WATER -- INTERFERENCE WITH DELIVERY. Any
superintendent or any person having control or charge of the said ditch,
canal or conduit, who shall wilfully neglect or refuse to deliver water as
provided in chapter 9, of title 42, or person or persons who shall prevent
or interfere Any person who willfully and wrongfully prevents or interferes
with the proper delivery of water to the person or persons having a right
thereto, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and the owner or owners of such
ditch, canal or conduit shall be liable in damages to the person or persons
deprived of the use of water to which they were entitled as provided in said
chapter 9.
SECTION 30. That Section 43-404A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
43-404A. CONTRACTS OF PAYMENT FOR REHABILITATION. If the reconstruc-
tion, rehabilitation, or replacement of dams, structures, or works deter-
mined necessary in accordance with section 43-401A, Idaho Code, involves a
dam, structure, or works which also provide water storage, diversion, or de-
livery of water to water users or water user organizations for the use of said


water on lands not within the boundaries of the district proposing the im-
provements, the district (hereinafter referred to as constructing district)
may contract with such water users or water user organizations for payment
by them, over a period of time not to exceed the period of any bonded indebt-
edness incurred by the constructing district to finance construction of the
improvements, of a proportionate share of the costs of such improvements,
including design, construction, land acquisition, and other related costs,
to include interest on the unpaid balance of said proportionate share of such
water users or water user organization at a rate equal to the average rate of
interest payable by the constructing district on any bonded indebtedness in-
curred by it in financing the improvements.
If the water user organization contracting for payment of a propor-
tionate share of the costs of the improvements is an irrigation district
(hereinafter referred to as contracting district) organized pursuant to ti-
tle 43, Idaho Code, the board of directors of such district shall negotiate a
proposed contract with the constructing district. Thereafter, the question
of entering into the proposed contract shall be submitted to the electors of
such contracting district in a manner substantially in conformance with the
provisions of section 43-401, Idaho Code. If at least two-thirds (2/3) of
the electors approve the execution of the contract, the board shall confirm
the proceeding as provided in connection with a bond issue, and following
confirmation, the board shall execute the contract and thereafter an annual
assessment to provide revenue for payment of the obligation and interest
thereon shall be levied and collected on lands within the contracting dis-
trict in the manner provided for assessment for payment of bonds and interest
thereon. The provisions of section 43-404, Idaho Code, shall be applicable
to apportionment of benefits accruing under the terms of said contract.
If the water user organization contracting for payment of a proportion-
ate share of the costs of improvements is an operating company entitled to a
lien for maintenance charges under chapter 22, title 42, Idaho Code, it shall
annually assess and collect the costs of meeting its obligations under the
contract as a toll, assessment, or charge under chapter 22, title 42, Idaho
Code.
If the water user organization contracting for payment of a proportion-
ate share of the costs of the improvements is a lateral ditch water user as-
sociation organized and operating under chapter 13, title 42, Idaho Code,
the annual costs of meeting the association's obligation under the contract
shall be included in the assessment made under section 42-1303, Idaho Code
pursuant to that chapter, and chapter 13, title 42, Idaho Code, shall apply
to the collection and disbursement of said assessment.
SECTION 31. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.